Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1736.07
Property tax refund; procedure; applicability.

Section 77-1736.06 is expressly intended to apply to all claims for refund of any property taxes pending on June 11, 1991.

Laws 1991, LB 829, § 16;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 17.